South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S96.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 17, Title 17 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 17-17-15.  In order to be eligible to serve or continue to serve as the county clerk of court of the common pleas, a person must: (1) be a citizen of the United States and of this State; (2) be a qualified elector of the applicable county; (3) have: (a) a four-year bachelor's degree from an accredited post-secondary institution; or (b) at least four years' experience: (i) in the field of law, criminal justice or business administration; (ii) as an employee in a clerk of court office in this state; or (iii) as a clerk of court in this State. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----